California statutes. Insurance Code
(d) During the first 30 days after the effective date of the health benefit plan, the individual shall have the option of changing coverage to a different health benefit plan design offered by the same carrier. If the individual notified the plan of the change within the first 15 days of a month, coverage under the new health benefit plan shall become effective no later than the first day of the following month. If an enrolled individual notified the carrier of the change after the 15th day of a month, coverage under the health benefit plan
 shall become effective no later than the first day of the second month following notification.

(e) (1) On and after January 1, 2014, and except as provided in paragraph (2), this section shall apply only to individual grandfathered health plans previously issued pursuant to this section to federally eligible defined individuals.

(2) If Section 5000A of the Internal Revenue Code, as added by Section 1501 of PPACA, is repealed or amended to no longer apply to the individual market, as defined in Section 2791 of the federal Public Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. Section 300gg-91), paragraph (1) shall become inoperative on the date of that repeal or amendment and this section shall apply to health benefit plans issued, amended, or renewed on or after that date.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision,
 the following definitions apply:

(A) “Grandfathered health plan” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 1251 of PPACA.

(B) “PPACA” means the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148), as amended by the federal Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010 (Public Law 111-152), and any rules, regulations, or guidance issued pursuant to that law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 441, Sec. 18.   (AB 1180)   Effective October 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

10901.4.

A carrier may not exclude any federally eligible defined individual, or his or her dependents, who would otherwise be entitled to health care services, on the basis of an actual or expected health condition of that individual or dependent. No health benefit plan may limit or exclude coverage for a specific federally eligible defined individual, or his or her dependents, by type of illness, treatment, medical condition, or accident.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 810, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

10901.7.

(a) The commissioner may require a carrier to discontinue the offering of health benefit plans or the acceptance of applications from any individual upon a determination by the commissioner that the plan carrier does not have sufficient financial viability, organization, and administrative capacity to assure the delivery of health care services to its enrollees.

(b) The commissioner’s determination shall follow an evaluation that includes a certification by the commissioner that the acceptance of an application or applications would place the carrier in a financially impaired condition.

(c) A carrier that has not offered coverage or accepted applications pursuant to this chapter shall not offer coverage or accept applications for any individual until the commissioner has determined that the carrier has ceased to be financially impaired.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 810, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

10901.8.

All health benefit plans offered to a federally eligible defined individual shall be renewable with respect to the individual and dependents at the option of the enrolled individual except in cases of:

(a) Nonpayment of the required premiums.

(b) Fraud or misrepresentation by the enrolled individual.

(c) The carrier ceases to provide or arrange for the provision of health care services for individual health benefit plan contracts in this state, provided, however, that the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) Notice of the decision to cease new or existing individual health benefit plans in this state is provided to the commissioner and to the contractholder.

(2) Individual health benefit plan contracts subject to this chapter shall not be canceled for 180 days after the date of the notice required under paragraph (1) and for that business of a carrier that remains in force, any carrier that ceases to offer for sale new individual health benefit plan contracts shall continue to be governed by this article with respect to business conducted under this chapter.

(3) A carrier that ceases to write new individual business in this state after the effective date of this chapter shall be prohibited from offering for sale new individual health benefit plan contracts in this state for a period of three years from the date of the notice to the commissioner.

(d) When a carrier withdraws a health benefit plan design from the individual market, provided that a carrier makes available to eligible individuals all health plan benefit designs that it makes available to new individual business, and provided that premium for the new health benefit plan complies with the renewal increase requirements set forth in Section 10901.9.

(e) (1) On and after January 1, 2014, and except as provided in paragraph (2), this section shall apply only to individual grandfathered health plans previously issued pursuant to this section to federally eligible defined individuals.

(2) If Section 5000A of the Internal Revenue Code, as added by Section 1501 of PPACA, is repealed or amended to no longer apply to the individual market, as defined in Section 2791 of the federal Public
 Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. Section 300gg-91), paragraph (1) shall become inoperative on the date of that repeal or amendment and this section shall apply to health benefit plans issued, amended, or renewed on or after that date.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, the following definitions apply:

(A) “Grandfathered health plan” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 1251 of PPACA.

(B) “PPACA” means the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148), as amended by the federal Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010 (Public Law 111-152), and any rules, regulations, or guidance issued pursuant to that law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 441, Sec. 19.   (AB 1180)   Effective October 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

10901.9.

(a) Commencing January 1, 2001, premiums for health benefit plans offered, delivered, amended, or renewed by carriers shall be subject to the following requirements:

(1) The premium for new business for a federally eligible defined individual shall not exceed the following amounts:

(A) For health benefit plans identified in subdivision (d) of Section 10785 that offer services through a preferred provider arrangement, the average premium paid by a subscriber of the Major Risk Medical Insurance Program who is of the same age and resides in the same geographic area as the federally eligible defined individual. However,
 for federally eligible defined individuals who are between 60 to 64 years of age, inclusive, the premium shall not exceed the average premium paid by a subscriber of the Major Risk Medical Insurance Program who is 59 years of age and resides in the same geographic area as the federally eligible defined individual.

(B) For health benefit plans identified in subdivision (d) of Section 10785 that do not offer services through a preferred provider arrangement, 170 percent of the standard premium charged to an individual who is of the same age and resides in the same geographic area as the federally eligible defined individual. However, for federally eligible defined individuals who are between 60 to 64 years of age, inclusive, the premium shall not exceed 170 percent of the standard premium charged to an individual who is 59 years of age and resides in the same geographic area as the federally eligible defined individual.

(2) The premium for in force business for a federally eligible defined individual shall not exceed the following amounts:

(A) For health benefit plans identified in subdivision (d) of Section 10785 that offer services through a preferred provider arrangement, the average premium paid by a subscriber of the Major Risk Medical Insurance Program who is of the same age and resides in the same geographic area as the federally eligible defined individual. However, for federally eligible defined individuals who are between 60 and 64 years of age, inclusive, the premium shall not exceed the average premium paid by a subscriber of the Major Risk Medical Insurance Program who is 59 years of age and resides in the same geographic area as the federally eligible defined individual.

(B) For health benefit plans identified in
 subdivision (d) of Section 10785 that do not offer services through a preferred provider arrangement, 170 percent of the standard premium charged to an individual who is of the same age and resides in the same geographic area as the federally eligible defined individual. However, for federally eligible defined individuals who are between 60 and 64 years of age, inclusive, the premium shall not exceed 170 percent of the standard premium charged to an individual who is 59 years of age and resides in the same geographic area as the federally eligible defined individual. The premium effective on January 1, 2001, shall apply to in force business at the earlier of either the time of renewal or July 1, 2001.

(3) This subdivision shall become inoperative January 1, 2014. This subdivision shall become operative on January 1, 2020.

(b) (1) Commencing January 1, 2014,
 premiums for health benefit plans offered, delivered, amended, or renewed by carriers shall be subject to the following requirements:

(A) With respect to the rate charged for coverage provided in 2014, the rate charged in 2013 for that coverage multiplied by 1.09.

(B) With respect to the rate charged for coverage provided in 2015 and each subsequent year, the rate charged in the prior year multiplied by a factor of one plus the percentage change in the statewide average premium for the second lowest cost silver plan offered on the Exchange. The Exchange shall determine the percentage change in the statewide average premium for the second lowest cost silver plan by subtracting clause (i) from clause (ii) and dividing the result by clause (i).

(i) The average of the premiums charged in the year prior to the applicable
 year for the second lowest cost silver plan in all 19 rating regions, with the premium for each region weighted based on the region’s relative share of the Exchange’s total individual enrollment according to the latest data available to the Exchange.

(ii) The average of the premiums to be charged in the applicable year for the second lowest cost silver plan in all 19 rating regions, with the premium for each region weighted based on the region’s relative share of the Exchange’s total individual enrollment according to the latest data available to the Exchange.

(C) The Exchange shall determine the percentage change in the statewide average premium no later than 30 days after the Exchange’s rates for individual coverage for the applicable year have been finalized.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “Exchange” means
 the California Health Benefit Exchange established pursuant to Section 100500 of the Government Code.

(3) This subdivision shall become operative on January 1, 2014, and shall become inoperative on January 1, 2020.

(c) The premium applied to a federally eligible defined individual may not increase by more than the following amounts:

(1) For health benefit plans identified in subdivision (d) of Section 10785 that offer services through a preferred provider arrangement, the average increase in the premiums charged to a subscriber of the Major Risk Medical Insurance Program who is of the same age and resides in the same geographic area as the federally eligible defined individual.

(2) For health benefit plans identified in subdivision (d) of Section 10785
 that do not offer services through a preferred provider arrangement, the increase in premiums charged to a nonfederally eligible defined individual who is of the same age and resides in the same geographic area as the federally eligible defined individual. The premium for an eligible individual may not be modified more frequently than every 12 months.

(3) For a contract that a carrier has discontinued offering, the premium applied to the first rating period of the new contract that the federally eligible defined individual elects to purchase shall be no greater than the premium applied in the prior rating period to the discontinued contract.

(d) (1) On and after January 1, 2014, and except as provided in paragraph (2), this section shall apply only to individual grandfathered health plans previously issued pursuant to this section to federally eligible
 defined individuals.

(2) If Section 5000A of the Internal Revenue Code, as added by Section 1501 of PPACA, is repealed or amended to no longer apply to the individual market, as defined in Section 2791 of the federal Public Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. Section 300gg-91), paragraph (1) shall become inoperative on the date of that repeal or amendment and this section shall apply to health benefit plans issued, amended, or renewed or amended on or after that date.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, the following definitions apply:

(A) “Grandfathered health plan” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 1251 of PPACA.

(B) “PPACA” means the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148), as amended by the federal
 Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010 (Public Law 111-152), and any rules, regulations, or guidance issued pursuant to that law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 441, Sec. 20.   (AB 1180)   Effective October 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

10902.

Carriers shall apply premiums consistently with respect to all federally eligible defined individuals who apply for coverage.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 810, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

10902.1.

In connection with the offering for sale of any health benefit plan designed to an individual, each carrier shall make a reasonable disclosure, as part of its solicitation and sales materials, of all individual contracts.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 810, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

10902.2.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to require a health benefit plan to offer a contract to an individual if the carrier does not otherwise offer contracts to individuals.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 810, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

10902.3.

(a) At least 20 business days prior to renewing or amending a health benefit plan contract subject to this chapter, or at least 20 business days prior to the initial offering of a health benefit plan subject to this chapter, a carrier shall file a statement with the commissioner in the same manner as required for small employers as outlined in Section 10717. The statement shall include a statement certifying that the carrier is in compliance with subdivision (a) of Section 10901.3 and with Section 10901.9. Any action by the commissioner, as permitted under Section 10717, to disapprove, suspend, or postpone the plan’s use of a carrier’s health benefit plan design shall be in writing, specifying the reasons the health benefit plan does not comply
 with the requirements of this chapter.

(b) Prior to making any changes in the premium, the carrier shall file an amendment in the same manner as required for small employers as outlined in Section 10717, and shall include a statement certifying the carrier is in compliance with subdivision (a) of Section 10901.3 and with Section 10901.9. All other changes to a health benefit plan previously filed with the commissioner pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be filed as an amendment in the same manner as required for small employers as outlined in Section 10717.

(c) (1) On and after January 1, 2014, and except as provided in paragraph (2), this section shall apply only to individual grandfathered health plans previously issued pursuant to this section to federally eligible defined individuals.

(2) If
 Section 5000A of the Internal Revenue Code, as added by Section 1501 of PPACA, is repealed or amended to no longer apply to the individual market, as defined in Section 2791 of the federal Public Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. Section 300gg-91), paragraph (1) shall become inoperative on the date of that repeal or amendment and this section shall apply to health benefit plans issued, amended, or renewed on or after that date.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, the following definitions apply:

(A) “Grandfathered health plan” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 1251 of PPACA.

(B) “PPACA” means the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148), as amended by the federal Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010 (Public Law 111-152), and any rules, regulations, or
 guidance issued pursuant to that law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 441, Sec. 21.   (AB 1180)   Effective October 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

10902.5.

The commissioner may issue regulations that are necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter. Any rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter may be adopted as emergency regulations in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. Until December 31, 2001, the adoption of these regulations shall be deemed an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare. The regulations shall be enforced by the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 810, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9.6. Consumer Operated and Oriented Plans [10930. - 10930.9.]

10930.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Consumer operated and oriented plan” means a nonprofit member organization or nonprofit member corporation that has been established consistent with the requirements of Section 1322 of PPACA and Subpart F (commencing with Section 156.500) of Part 156 of Subchapter B of Subtitle A of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations and remains in full compliance with those requirements. A consumer operated and oriented plan shall also be
 known as a “CO-OP.”

(b) “Formation board” means the initial board of directors of a CO-OP before it has begun accepting enrollment and had an election by the members of the CO-OP to the board of directors.

(c) “Member” includes all individuals, including dependents, 18 years of age or older covered under health insurance policies issued
 by the CO-OP insurer.

(d) “Operational board” means the board of directors elected by the members of the CO-OP after it has begun accepting enrollment under its health insurance policies.

(e) “PPACA” means the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148),
 as amended by the Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010 (Public Law 111-152), and any rules or regulations issued thereunder.

(f) “Nonprofit member organization” or “nonprofit member corporation” means a nonprofit public benefit corporation organized under Part 2 (commencing with Section 5110) of Division 2 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code, a nonprofit mutual benefit corporation organized under Part 3 (commencing with Section 7110) of Division 2 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code, or a similar entity organized under applicable provisions of the Corporations Code,
 or in the case of a foreign corporation, a nonprofit public benefit corporation, a mutual benefit corporation, or a similar entity organized under nonprofit laws in a state other than California.

(g) “Solvency loan” means a loan provided by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services to a nonprofit member
 organization or nonprofit member corporation seeking to become licensed as a CO-OP insurer, to be used to assist in meeting the state’s solvency and reserve requirements.

(h) “Start-up loan” means a loan provided by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services to a nonprofit member organization or nonprofit member corporation seeking to become licensed as a CO-OP insurer, to be used for allowed expenses associated with establishing a CO-OP, as further specified by PPACA.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 859, Sec. 3.   (AB 1846)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

10930.1.

(a) The commissioner shall have the authority to issue a certificate of authority as a disability insurer to a CO-OP that has been organized as a nonprofit member organization or nonprofit member corporation under the laws of this state. The commissioner may also issue a certificate of authority as a disability insurer to a foreign CO-OP that has been organized as a nonprofit member organization or nonprofit member corporation under the laws of another state, provided that the entity meets the requirements governing CO-OPs under PPACA and this
 chapter. A CO-OP seeking or maintaining a certificate of authority pursuant to this chapter shall be subject to the same fees that are imposed on mutual insurers.

(b) A CO-OP admitted as a CO-OP insurer shall be subject to the same premium taxes as are imposed on for-profit health insurers with a certificate of authority from the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 859, Sec. 3.   (AB 1846)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

10930.2.

A domestic or foreign insurer admitted as a CO-OP insurer shall be subject to the same “paid-in capital” or “capital paid-in” requirements as are imposed on domestic and foreign mutual insurers pursuant to Sections 36 and 4011.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 859, Sec. 3.   (AB 1846)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

10930.3.

(a) A domestic or foreign CO-OP admitted as a CO-OP insurer shall be subject to all of the provisions of this code that are applicable to insurers issuing policies of health insurance in the state and all applicable rules and regulations of the commissioner, including, but not limited to, the general provisions governing issuance of a certificate of authority in Article 3 (commencing with Section 699) of, the examination provisions in Article 4 (commencing with Section 729) of, the risk-based capital requirements in Article 4.1 (commencing with
 Section 739) of, and the financial statement filing requirements in Article 10 (commencing with Section 900) of, Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1.

(b) In compliance with Section 1322(c)(5) of PPACA (42 U.S.C. Sec. 18042(c)(5)), and any rules or regulations issued under that section, a domestic or foreign CO-OP admitted as a CO-OP insurer shall be subject to any state laws that do not prevent the application of requirements under PPACA.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 859, Sec. 3.   (AB 1846)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

10930.4.

(a) A solvency loan obtained by a CO-OP shall be treated as a surplus note and shall be subject to the same requirements as are imposed on mutual insurers pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 4040) of Chapter 4 of Part 1 of Division 2. The commissioner may request any documentation relating to a CO-OP’s start-up loan or solvency loan.

(b) A CO-OP shall be subject to the same securities permit requirements as are imposed upon mutual insurers pursuant to Section 4042;
 however, the commissioner shall have the authority to waive the requirements under Section 4042 upon a determination that they are not applicable following a full review of the CO-OP’s plan of operations and any other documents as requested by the commissioner prior to the admission of the CO-OP.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 859, Sec. 3.   (AB 1846)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

10930.5.

The provisions of Section 699.5 shall apply to any insurer admitted as a CO-OP insurer; however, any loans received by the CO-OP in the form of a solvency or start-up loan shall not be construed as any form of subsidy, ownership, or financial control of the CO-OP insurer within the meaning of Section 699.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 859, Sec. 3.   (AB 1846)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

10930.6.

(a) A CO-OP shall be subject at all times to the prohibitions in PPACA against converting or selling to a for-profit or nonconsumer-operated entity at any time after receiving a solvency loan.

(b) A CO-OP shall do all of the following, in addition to any other requirements imposed under Section 156.515 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations:

(1) Implement policies and procedures to foster and ensure member control
 of the organization. For purposes of this paragraph, a CO-OP shall meet the following requirements:

(A) The CO-OP shall have governing documents that incorporate governing rules that ensure that the directors of the operational board are elected by a majority vote of a quorum of the CO-OP members.

(B) All members of the CO-OP shall be eligible to vote for each director on the CO-OP’s operational board.

(C) Each member of the CO-OP shall have one vote in the election of each director of the CO-OP’s operational board.

(D) The first elected directors of the CO-OP’s operational board shall be elected no later than one year after the effective date on which the
 CO-OP provides coverage to its first member; the entire operational board shall be elected no later than two years after the same date.

(E) Elections of the directors on the CO-OP’s operational board shall be contested so that the total number of candidates for vacant positions on the operational board exceeds the number of vacant positions, except in cases where a seat is vacated midterm due to death, resignation, or removal.

(F) A majority of the voting directors on the operational board shall be members of the CO-OP.

(2) Have an operational board of directors that meets the following requirements:

(A) Each director shall have one vote unless he or she is a nonvoting director.

(B) Positions on the board of directors may be designated for individuals with specialized expertise, experience, or affiliation (for example, providers, employers, including small business consortia, and unions); however, those positions shall not constitute a majority of the operational board even if the individuals in those positions are also members of the CO-OP.

(C) (i) No representative of any federal, state, or local government, or of any political subdivision or instrumentality thereof, and no representative of any organization described in Section 156.510(b)(1)(i) of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations
 may serve as staff of the CO-OP or on the CO-OP’s formation board or operational board.

(ii) No board member or staff of the CO-OP shall enter into an agreement or transaction that would jeopardize member control as required by Section 156.515 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations. A board member or staff of the CO-OP shall only enter into arm’s length transactions as described in Section 156.510(b)(2)(ii) of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(3) Have governing documents that incorporate ethics, conflict of interest, and disclosure standards. These standards shall protect against insurance industry involvement and interference. In addition, these standards shall ensure that each director acts in the sole interest of the CO-OP, its members, and its local geographic community, as appropriate, and acts consistently with the terms of the CO-OP’s governance documents and applicable state and federal law. At a minimum, these standards shall include the following:

(A) A mechanism to identify potential ethical or other conflicts of interest.

(B) A duty on the CO-OP’s executive officers and directors to publicly disclose all potential conflicts of interest pursuant to the same standards required for state boards or commissions.

(C) A process to determine the extent to which a conflict exists.

(D) A process to address any conflict of interest.

(E) A process to be followed in the event a director or executive officer of the CO-OP violates the standards described in this paragraph.

(c) A violation of any of the requirements of this section shall constitute grounds for revocation of the CO-OP insurer’s certificate of authority, in addition to any other grounds in this code for revocation of the
 certificate.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 859, Sec. 3.   (AB 1846)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

10930.7.

A CO-OP insurer is insolvent if its surplus becomes less than the amount of paid-in capital required of a capital stock company to qualify to transact the class of disability and health insurance. The conservation and liquidation provisions of Article 14 (commencing with Section 1010) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1 shall apply to CO-OP insurers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 859, Sec. 3.   (AB 1846)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

10930.8.

In addition to any applicable requirements in this code for maintaining a certificate of authority, a CO-OP is required at all times to be in full compliance with the requirements of PPACA governing CO-OPs. The commissioner may request the federal government’s certification that a CO-OP is in compliance with the requirements of PPACA governing CO-OPs, as well as the status of the CO-OP’s compliance with its obligations under any loan or loan modification agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 859, Sec. 3.   (AB 1846)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

10930.9.

The department may adopt regulations implementing this chapter pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 859, Sec. 3.   (AB 1846)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9.7. Child Access to Health Insurance [10950. - 10960.5.]

10950.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Child” means any individual under 19 years of age.

(b) “Individual grandfathered plan coverage” means health care coverage in which an individual was enrolled on March 23, 2010, consistent with Section 1251 of PPACA and any rules or regulations adopted pursuant to that law.

(c) “Initial open enrollment period” means the open enrollment period beginning on January 1, 2011, and ending 60 days thereafter.

(d) “Late enrollee” means a child without coverage who did not enroll in a health benefit plan during
 an open enrollment period because of any of the following:

(1) The child lost dependent coverage due to termination or change in employment status of the child or the person through whom the child was covered; cessation of an employer’s contribution toward an employee or dependent’s coverage; death of the person through whom the child was covered as a dependent; legal separation; divorce; loss of coverage under the Healthy Families Program, the Access for Infants and Mothers Program, or the Medi-Cal program; or adoption of the child.

(2) The child became a resident of California during a month that was not the child’s birth month.

(3) The child is born as a resident of California and did not enroll in the month of birth.

(4) The child is mandated to be
 covered pursuant to a valid state or federal court order.

(e) “Open enrollment period” means the annual open enrollment period subsequent to the initial open enrollment period, applicable to each individual child that is the month of the child’s birth date.

(f) “PPACA” means the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148), as amended by the Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010 (Public Law 111-152), and any subsequent rules or regulations issued pursuant to that law.

(g) “Preexisting condition exclusion” means, with respect to coverage, a limitation or exclusion of benefits relating to a condition based on the fact that the condition was present before the date of enrollment of the coverage, whether or not any medical advice, diagnosis, care, or treatment was recommended or
 received before that date.

(h) “Responsible party for a child” means an adult having custody of the child or with responsibility for the financial needs of the child, including the responsibility to provide health care coverage.

(i) “Standard risk rate” means the lowest rate that can be offered for a child with the same benefit plan, effective date, age, geographic region, and family status.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 656, Sec. 6.   (AB 2244)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Inoperative, pursuant to Section 10960.5, on January 1, 2014, subject to condition for resuming operation.)
-------------------------------------------

10951.

(a) (1) During each open enrollment period, every carrier offering health benefit plans in the individual market, other than individual grandfathered plan coverage, shall offer to the responsible party for a child coverage for the child that does not exclude or limit coverage due to any preexisting condition of the child.

(b) A carrier offering coverage in the individual market shall not reject an application for a health benefit plan from a child or filed on behalf of a child by the responsible party during an open enrollment period or from a late enrollee during a period no longer than 63 days from the qualifying event listed in subdivision (d) of Section 10950.

(c) Except to the extent permitted by federal law, rules, regulations, or guidance issued by the relevant federal agency, a carrier shall not condition the issuance or offering of individual coverage on any of the following factors:

(1) Health status.

(2) Medical condition, including physical and mental illnesses.

(3) Claims experience.

(4) Receipt of health care.

(5) Medical history.

(6) Genetic information.

(7) Evidence of insurability, including conditions arising out of acts of domestic
 violence.

(8) Disability.

(9) Any other health status-related factor as determined by department.

This subdivision shall not apply to a health benefit plan providing individual grandfathered plan coverage.

(d) When a responsible party for a child submits a premium payment, based on the quoted premium charges, and that payment is delivered or postmarked, whichever occurs earlier, within the first 15 days of the month, coverage under the health benefit plan shall become effective no later than the first day of the following month. When that payment is neither delivered nor postmarked until after the 15th day of the month, coverage shall become effective no later than the first day of the second month following delivery or postmark of the payment.

(e) A carrier offering coverage in the individual market shall not reject the request of a responsible party for a child to include that child as a dependent on an existing health benefit plan that includes dependent coverage during an open enrollment period.

(f) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit a carrier offering coverage in the individual market from establishing rules for eligibility for coverage and offering coverage pursuant to those rules for children and individuals based on factors otherwise authorized under federal and state law for health benefit plans in addition to those offered on a guaranteed issue basis during an open enrollment period to children or late enrollees pursuant to this chapter. However, a carrier, other than a carrier providing individual grandfathered plan coverage, shall not impose a preexisting condition provision on coverage,
 including dependent coverage, offered to a child.

(g) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to require a carrier to establish a new service area or to offer health care coverage on a statewide basis, outside of the carrier’s existing service area.

(h) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prevent a carrier from offering coverage to a family member of an enrollee in grandfathered health plan coverage consistent with Section 1251 of PPACA.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 656, Sec. 6.   (AB 2244)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Inoperative, pursuant to Section 10960.5, on January 1, 2014, subject to condition for resuming operation.)
-------------------------------------------

10952.

This chapter shall not apply to health benefit plans for coverage of Medicare services pursuant to contracts with the United States government, Medicare supplement policies, Medi-Cal contracts with the State Department of Health Care Services, policies offered under the Healthy Families Program, long-term care coverage, or specialized health benefit plans.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 656, Sec. 6.   (AB 2244)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Inoperative, pursuant to Section 10960.5, on January 1, 2014, subject to condition for resuming operation.)
-------------------------------------------

10953.

(a) Upon the effective date of this chapter, a carrier shall fairly and affirmatively offer, market, and sell all of the carrier’s health benefit plans that are offered and sold to a child or the responsible party for a child in each service area in which the plan provides or arranges for health care coverage during any open enrollment period, to late enrollees, and during any other period in which state or federal law, rules, regulations, or guidance expressly provide that a carrier shall not condition offer or acceptance of coverage on any preexisting condition.

(b) No carrier or solicitor shall, directly or indirectly, engage in the following activities:

(1) Encourage or direct a child or responsible party for a child to refrain from filing an application for coverage with a carrier because of the health status, claims experience, industry, occupation, or geographic location, provided that the location is within the carrier’s approved service area, of the child.

(2) Encourage or direct a child or responsible party for a child to seek coverage from another carrier because of the health status, claims experience, industry, occupation, or geographic location, provided that the location is within the carrier’s approved service area, of the child.

(c) A carrier shall not, directly or indirectly, enter into any contract, agreement, or arrangement with a solicitor that provides for or results in the compensation paid to a solicitor for the sale of a health benefit plan to be
 varied because of the health status, claims experience, industry, occupation, or geographic location of the child. This subdivision does not apply to a compensation arrangement that provides compensation to a solicitor on the basis of percentage of premium, provided that the percentage shall not vary because of the health status, claims experience, industry, occupation, or geographic area of the child.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 656, Sec. 6.   (AB 2244)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Inoperative, pursuant to Section 10960.5, on January 1, 2014, subject to condition for resuming operation.)
-------------------------------------------
